Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
ARTICLE 78
TEACHER PREPARATION PROGRAMS

Editor's note:

This article 78 was added with relocations in 2019. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated. For a detailed comparison of this article 78, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Section

PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS

PART 2 COLLABORATIVE EDUCATOR PREPARATION GRANT PROGRAM

PART 3 TEACHING FELLOWSHIP PROGRAMS